Vermont, session 2025-2026, H363.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 17 V.S.A. chapter 55, subchapter 4 is added to read:
Subchapter 4. Ranked-Choice Voting
§ 2691a. DEFINITIONS
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Candidate” means a candidate running for a single-seat office in a
town, city, or village that has adopted the ranked-choice voting system
pursuant to section 2691b of this title.
VT LEG #380426 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.363
2025 Page 2 of 6
(2) “Candidate pairing” means a unique dyadic arrangement of two
different candidates contending for an office in an election. If N is the number
of candidates contending for an office, then the number of candidate pairings is
N(N-1)/2.
(3) “Consistent majority winner” means the sole candidate who is the
winning candidate in every paired comparison among all candidates.
(4) “Paired comparison” or “head-to-head comparison” means an
evaluation of two candidates for the purpose of determining which candidate
has the greater number of ballots ranking that candidate over the other
candidate in the pair.
(5) “Plurality” means the election outcome in which one candidate
receives more votes than any other candidate, but not necessarily a majority of
the votes cast.
(6) “Presiding officer” means the town clerk or an alternative official as
provided for in section 2452 of this title.
§ 2691b. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING SYSTEM; APPLICATION
(a) Application. Unless otherwise specified by State law, the provisions of
the ranked-choice voting system described in this subchapter shall not apply to
the election of a candidate running for a single-seat office in a town, city, or
village unless that town, city, or village votes, at its annual meeting or at a
special meeting called for that purpose, to have those provisions apply.
VT LEG #380426 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.363
2025 Page 3 of 6
(b) Duration. Once a town, city, or village votes to adopt the ranked-choice
voting system described in this subchapter, this ranked-choice voting system
shall be used in that manner until the town, city, or village votes to discontinue
use of the system.
(c) Australian ballot system. In order to begin using a ranked-choice
voting system, a town, city, or village must be using the Australian ballot
system, pursuant to section 2680 of this title, at the time of an election using a
ranked-choice voting system.
§ 2691c. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING SYSTEM; BALLOTS
(a) Form of ballot. Notwithstanding any contrary provisions in section
2681a of this title, a ballot for an election using the ranked-choice system in a
town, city, or village shall allow voters to rank candidates in order of ordinal
preference. The names of all candidates on the ballot shall be listed in
alphabetical order. The ballot shall allow voters to assign rankings to
candidates that are equal to the number of printed candidate names and blank
write-in lines.
(b) Counting votes.
(1) A ballot assigning a candidate a lower ordinal preference shall be
considered to have assigned a higher ranking to that candidate than to a
candidate who was assigned a higher ordinal preference. A ballot assigning a
candidate with the lowest ordinal rank shall be considered to have designated
VT LEG #380426 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.363
2025 Page 4 of 6
that candidate as the highest-ranked candidate on that ballot and the voter’s
first-ranked preference.
(2) A voter may assign multiple candidates the same ranking.
(3) Any candidate not assigned a ranking on a ballot shall be considered
to have a lower ranking than every candidate assigned with any ordinal
ranking.
§ 2691d. RANKED-CHOICE VOTING SYSTEM; IMPLEMENTATION
(a) Implementation. A town, city, or village that has adopted the ranked-
choice voting system pursuant to section 2691b of this title shall implement its
elections of candidates running for single-seat offices in that town, city, or
village in accordance with this section.
(b) Tabulation at polling places. All elections using the ranked-choice
voting system shall be tabulated at polling places by the presiding officer.
(c) Initial tabulation. Upon tabulation of the ballots, if a candidate receives
a majority of first-ranked preferences, that candidate is declared the winner of
the election.
(d) Additional tabulation.
(1) Upon tabulation of the ballots, if no candidate receives a majority of
first-ranked preferences, the ballots shall be tabulated again by paired
comparison and examining every possible paired comparison. In each paired
VT LEG #380426 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.363
2025 Page 5 of 6
comparison, the presiding officer shall note the winning candidate in each
paired comparison or if there is instead a tie.
(2) Consistent majority winner. If a candidate is the winning candidate
in every paired comparison, the candidate shall be declared the winner of the
election.
(3) No consistent majority winner. If there is no candidate who is the
winning candidate in every paired comparison, then the winning candidate of
the paired comparison involving the two candidates having the most first-
ranking preferences is declared the winner.
§ 2691e. RESULTS REPORTING
Results for an election using the ranked-choice voting system shall be
published at polling places on the day of the election as soon as practicable
after the closing of polling places. Results shall indicate:
(1) the number of first-ranked preference ballots each candidate received
in the initial tabulation; and
(2) an accounting of the paired comparisons, including a list of all paired
comparisons, the candidates in each paired comparison, the number of ballots
assigned ranking each candidate over the other candidate in each paired
comparison, and the winner of each paired comparison.
VT LEG #380426 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.363
2025 Page 6 of 6
§ 2691f. RULEMAKING
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules pursuant to 3 V.S.A. chapter 25 for
the proper and efficient administration of the ranked-choice system in towns,
cities, and villages.
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #380426 v.1